California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
-------------------------------------------

5899.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) It is the intent of the Legislature to address seismic safety needs throughout this state by permitting voluntary individual efforts to improve the seismic safety of homes and buildings. The Legislature further intends that this chapter should be used to finance the installation of seismic strengthening improvements that are permanently fixed to residential, commercial, industrial, agricultural, or other real property, including, but not limited to, the seismic strengthening of cripple walls and sill plate anchorage of light, wood-framed buildings. 

(2) The upfront cost of making
 residential, commercial, industrial, agricultural, or other real property more seismically safe prevents many property owners from making those improvements. To make those improvements more affordable and to promote the installation of those strengthening improvements, it is necessary to authorize an alternative procedure for authorizing assessments to finance the cost of seismic strengthening improvements. 

(3) A public purpose will be served by a voluntary contractual assessment program that provides the legislative body of any public agency with the authority to finance the installation of seismic strengthening improvements that are permanently fixed to residential, commercial, industrial, agricultural, or other real property. 

(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(1) For the purpose of financing the installation of seismic strengthening improvements, “public agency” means a city, county, or city and county. The definition of “city” in Section 5005 shall not apply to this paragraph. 

(2) “Seismic strengthening improvements” means permanent seismic safety improvements fixed to residential, commercial, industrial, agricultural, or other real property. 

(c) The legislative body of any public agency may designate an area, in the manner provided pursuant to Section 5898.20, within which authorized public agency officials and property owners may enter into voluntary contractual assessments to finance the installation of seismic strengthening improvements that are permanently fixed to real property pursuant to this chapter. 

(d) For purposes of establishing a voluntary contractual assessment program relating to seismic strengthening improvements, the legislative body shall make the determinations required pursuant to Section 5898.20 by adopting a resolution indicating its intention to do so. The resolution of intention shall identify the kinds of seismic strengthening improvements that may be financed and shall include all of the information that is required pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5898.20, including, but not limited to, directing an appropriate public agency official to prepare a report pursuant to Section 5898.22. 

(e) For purposes of the report required pursuant to Section 5898.22, relating to a voluntary contractual assessment program for seismic strengthening improvements, the designated public agency official shall satisfy the requirements of paragraph
 (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 5898.22 by identifying the types of seismic strengthening improvements that may be financed through the use of contractual assessments.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, upon the written consent of an authorized public agency official, the proposed arrangements for financing the program pertaining to the installation of seismic strengthening improvements that are permanently fixed to real property may authorize the property owner to purchase directly the related equipment and materials for the installation of seismic strengthening improvements and to contract directly for the installation of seismic strengthening improvements that are permanently fixed to the property owner’s residential, commercial, industrial, agricultural, or other real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 28, Sec. 2.   (AB 184)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5899.2.

For the purpose of financing the installation of distributed generation renewable energy sources pursuant to this chapter, “permanently fixed” includes, but is not limited to, systems attached to a residential, commercial, industrial, agricultural, or other real property pursuant to a power purchase agreement or lease between the owner of the system and the owner of the assessed property, if the power purchase agreement or lease contains all of the following provisions:

(a) The attached system is an eligible renewable energy resource pursuant to the California Renewables Portfolio Standard Program (Article 16 (commencing with Section 399.11) of Chapter 2.3 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public
 Utilities Code).

(b) The term of the power purchase agreement or lease is at least as long as the term of the related assessment contract.

(c) The owner of the attached system agrees to install, maintain, and monitor the system for the entire term of the power purchase agreement or lease.

(d) The owner of the attached system is not permitted to remove the system prior to completion of the term of the contractual assessment lien.

(e) After installation, the power purchase agreement or lease is paid, either partially or in full, using the funds from the contractual assessment program.

(f) The right
 to receive the electricity from the system, through a power purchase agreement or lease or the right to the system itself, is tied to the ownership of the assessed real property and is required to be automatically transferred with the title to the real property whether the title is transferred by voluntary sale, judicial or nonjudicial foreclosure, or by any other means.

(g) The power purchase agreement or lease identifies the public agency that is a party to the assessment contract on the real property as a third-party beneficiary of the power purchase agreement or lease until the assessment lien on the property has been fully paid and, only until that time, prohibits amendments to the power purchase agreement or lease without the consent of the public agency.

(h) In order to
 ensure that the property owner is guaranteed the electric power from the system for the length of the lien, the system shall not be removed if the owner of the attached system is not performing its obligations under the contract, and one of the following is true:

(1) The owner of the attached system does both of the following:

(A) Covenants in its contract with the property owner that neither the owner of the attached system nor any successor in interest will remove or permanently decommission the attached system during the term of the contract.

(B) Warrants in the contract with the property owner that no assignee, creditor, partner, or owner of the attached system’s owner has, as of the date of the contract or during the
 remaining term of the contract, the right to remove or permanently decommission the attached system.

(2) The owner of the attached system must be a bankruptcy remote special purpose entity that is bankruptcy remote and meets all of the following conditions:

(A) It does not engage in any business other than owning the attached systems and entering into electricity contracts with the homeowner.

(B) It has no material debt.

(C) Its contracts are either entered into with unrelated third parties or have terms negotiated at arms length.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 599, Sec. 8.   (AB 1883)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5899.3.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) This chapter should be used to finance the installation of electric vehicle charging infrastructure that is permanently fixed to residential, commercial, industrial, agricultural, or other real property. 

(2) Electric vehicle charging infrastructure is a necessary component to transitioning to increase electric vehicle usage. Electric vehicles and their electric charging infrastructure also address the issue of global climate change. 

(3) The upfront cost
 of installing electric vehicle charging infrastructure improvements for residential, commercial, industrial, agricultural, or other real property prevents many property owners from making those improvements. To make those improvements more affordable and to promote the installation of those improvements, it is necessary to authorize an alternative procedure for authorizing assessments to finance the cost of installing electric vehicle charging infrastructure. 

(4) The Legislature declares that a public purpose will be served by a voluntary contractual assessment program that provides the legislative body of a public agency with the authority to finance the installation of electric vehicle charging infrastructure that is permanently fixed to residential, commercial, industrial, agricultural, or other real property. 

(b) For
 the purpose of financing the installation of electric vehicle charging infrastructure, “public agency” means a county, city, city and county, or a municipal utility district, an irrigation district, or public utility district that owns and operates an electric distribution system. The definition of “city” in Section 5005 shall not apply to this section.

(c) The legislative body of any public agency may designate an area, in the manner provided pursuant to Section 5898.20, within which authorized public agency officials and property owners may enter into voluntary contractual assessments to finance the installation of electric vehicle charging infrastructure that is permanently fixed to real property pursuant to this chapter. 

(d) For purposes of establishing a voluntary contractual assessment program relating to electric vehicle charging
 infrastructure, the legislative body shall make the determinations required pursuant to Section 5898.20 by adopting a resolution indicating its intention to do so. The resolution of intention shall identify the kinds of electric vehicle charging infrastructure that may be financed and shall include all of the information that is required pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5898.20, including, but not limited to, directing an appropriate public agency official to prepare a report pursuant to Section 5898.22. 

(e) For purposes of the report required pursuant to Section 5898.22, relating to a voluntary contractual assessment program for electric vehicle charging infrastructure, the designated public agency official shall satisfy the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 5898.22 by identifying the types of electric vehicle charging infrastructure that may be financed through the use of
 contractual assessments.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, upon the written consent of an authorized public agency official, the proposed arrangements for financing the program pertaining to the installation of electric vehicle charging infrastructure that is permanently fixed to real property may authorize the property owner to purchase directly the related equipment and materials for the installation of electric vehicle charging infrastructure and to contract directly for the installation of electric vehicle charging infrastructure that is permanently fixed to the property owner’s residential, commercial, industrial, agricultural, or other real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 649, Sec. 8.   (SB 1340)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5899.4.

(a) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide homeowners and businesses with an affordable way to finance improvements to their homes and buildings that make those facilities more resistant to wildfire by permitting voluntary individual efforts to improve the wildfire resilience and safety of those facilities. The Legislature further intends that this chapter should be used to finance the installation of wildfire safety improvements that are permanently fixed to residential, commercial, industrial, agricultural, or other real property.

(2) The upfront cost of making residential, commercial, industrial, agricultural, or other real property more resistant to wildfire prevents many property owners from making those
 improvements. To make those improvements more affordable and to promote the installation of wildfire safety improvements, it is necessary to authorize an alternative procedure for authorizing assessments to finance the cost of wildfire safety improvements.

(3) A public purpose will be served by a voluntary contractual assessment program that provides the legislative body of any public agency with the authority to finance the installation of wildfire safety improvements that are permanently fixed to residential, commercial, industrial, agricultural, or other real property.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) For the purpose of financing the installation of wildfire safety improvements, “public agency” means a city, county, or city and county. The definition of “city” in Section 5005 shall not apply to this
 paragraph. 

(2) “Wildfire safety improvements” means permanent wildfire resilience and safety improvements fixed to existing residential, commercial, industrial, agricultural, or other real property. An improvement within the meaning of this paragraph means any of the components identified by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection at www.readyforwildfire.org/Hardening-Your-Home/, as updated by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection or at a subsequent Internet Web site than can be fixed to an existing building or structure. A PACE assessment that finances a wildfire safety improvement shall not be eligible for a waiver of the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 22687 of the Financial Code pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 22687 of the Financial Code. In order to qualify under this paragraph, a wildfire safety improvement shall be fixed to an existing building or structure,
 and shall not be used as a part of a project to construct a new home or to rebuild or reconstruct a home that was destroyed or damaged in a fire.

 (c) The legislative body of any public agency that has accepted the designation of Very High Fire Hazard Severity Zone pursuant to Section 51179 of the Government Code may designate an area, in the manner provided pursuant to Section 5898.20, within which authorized public agency officials and property owners may enter into voluntary contractual assessments to finance the installation of wildfire safety improvements that are permanently fixed to real property pursuant to this chapter. 

(d) For purposes of establishing a voluntary contractual assessment program relating to wildfire safety improvements, the legislative body shall make the determinations required pursuant to Section 5898.20 by adopting a
 resolution indicating its intention to do so. The resolution of intention shall identify the kinds of wildfire safety improvements that may be financed and shall include all of the information that is required pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5898.20, including, but not limited to, directing an appropriate public agency official to prepare a report pursuant to Section 5898.22. 

(e) For purposes of the report required pursuant to Section 5898.22, relating to a voluntary contractual assessment program for wildfire safety improvements, the designated public agency official shall satisfy the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 5898.22 by identifying the types of wildfire safety improvements that may be financed through the use of contractual assessments.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of
 this chapter, upon the written consent of an authorized public agency official, the proposed arrangements for financing the program pertaining to the installation of wildfire safety improvements that are permanently fixed to real property may authorize the property owner to purchase directly the related equipment and materials for the installation of wildfire safety improvements and to contract directly for the installation of wildfire safety improvements that are permanently fixed to the property owner’s residential, commercial, industrial, agricultural, or other real property. 

(g) It is the responsibility of the property owner to contact the property owner’s insurance provider to determine whether the wildfire safety improvement to be financed by the PACE assessment is covered by the property owner’s insurance plan and whether that improvement will impact the insurance rate.

(h) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 837, Sec. 12.   (SB 465)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 29.1. Clean Energy Assessment Contracts [5900. - 5954.]

5900.

The provisions of this article shall apply exclusively to residential real property with four or fewer units.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 484, Sec. 1.   (SB 242)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5901.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to any public agency that does not use a program administrator to administer a PACE program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 484, Sec. 1.   (SB 242)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5902.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Assessment contract” means an agreement entered into between all property owners of record on real property and a public agency in which, for voluntary contractual assessments imposed on the real property, the public agency provides a PACE assessment for the installation of one or more efficiency improvements on the real property in accordance with a PACE program, specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5898.20 or Section 5899, 5899.3, or 5899.4, or a special tax described in Section 53328.1 of the Government Code.

(b) “Authorized representative” means an attorney-in-fact, as defined in Section 4014 of the Probate Code, or conservator of the estate, as defined in Section
 2400 of the Probate Code, of the property owner.

(c) “Efficiency improvement” means one or more permanent improvements fixed to real property.

(d) “PACE assessment” means a voluntary contractual assessment, voluntary special tax, or special tax, as described in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 26054 of the Public Resources Code.

(e) “PACE program” means a program in which financing is provided for the installation of efficiency improvements on real property and funded through the use of property assessments, as well as other program components defined in this section, established pursuant to any of the following:

(1) Chapter 29 (commencing with Section 5898.10) of Part 3 of this code.

(2) The Mello-Roos Community Facilities Act of 1982 (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(3) A charter city’s constitutional authority under Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution.

(f) “Program administrator” means an entity administering a PACE program on behalf of, and with the written consent of, a public agency.

(g) “Property owner” means all property owners of record on the property subject to the PACE assessment.

(h) “Public agency” means a city, including a charter city, county, city and county, municipal utility district, community services district, community facilities district, joint powers authority, sanitary district, sanitation district, or
 water district, as defined in Section 20200 of the Water Code, that has established or participates in a PACE program, and utilizes a program administrator.

(i) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 837, Sec. 13.   (SB 465)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 837)
-------------------------------------------

5902.

For purposes of this chapter: 

(a) “Assessment contract” means an agreement entered into between all property owners of record on real property and a public agency in which, for voluntary contractual assessments imposed on the real property, the public agency provides a PACE assessment for the installation of one or more efficiency improvements on the real property in accordance with a PACE program, specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5898.20 or Section 5899 or 5899.3, or a special tax described in Section 53328.1 of the Government Code.

(b) “Authorized
 representative” means an attorney-in-fact, as defined in Section 4014 of the Probate Code, or conservator of the estate, as defined in Section 2400 of the Probate Code, of the property owner.

(c) “Efficiency improvement” means one or more permanent improvements fixed to real property.

(d) “PACE assessment” means a voluntary contractual assessment, voluntary special tax, or special tax, as described in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 26054 of the Public Resources Code.

(e) “PACE program” means a program in which financing is provided for the installation of efficiency improvements on real property and funded through the use of
 property assessments, as well as other program components defined in this section, established pursuant to any of the following:

(1) Chapter 29 (commencing with Section 5898.10) of Part 3 of this code.

(2) The Mello-Roos Community Facilities Act of 1982 (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(3) A charter city’s constitutional authority under Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution.

(f) “Program administrator” means an entity
 administering a PACE program on behalf of, and with the written consent of, a public agency.

(g) “Property owner” means all property owners of record on the property subject to the PACE assessment.

(h) “Public agency” means a city, including a charter city, county, city and county, municipal utility district, community services district, community facilities district, joint powers authority, sanitary district, sanitation district, or water district, as defined in Section 20200 of the Water Code, that has established or participates in a PACE program, and utilizes a program administrator. 

(i) This section shall become operative on
 January 1, 2029.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 837, Sec. 14.   (SB 465)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5913.

(a) (1) Before a property owner executes an assessment contract the program administrator shall do the following:

(A) Make an oral confirmation that at least one owner of the property has a copy of the contract assessment documents required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5898.20 or Section 5899, 5899.3, or 5899.4, or Section 53328.1 of the Government Code, as applicable, with all the key terms completed, the financing estimate and disclosure form specified in Section 5898.17, and the right to cancel form specified in Section 5898.16, with hard copies available upon request.

(B) Make an oral confirmation of the key terms of the assessment contract, in plain language,
 with the property owner on the call or to a verified authorized representative of the owner on the call and shall obtain acknowledgment from the property owner on the call to whom the oral confirmation is given.

(2) The oral confirmation required pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following information:

(A) The property owner on the call has the right to have other persons present for the call, and an inquiry as to whether the property owner would like to exercise the right to include anyone else on the call. This shall occur at the onset of the call, after the determination of the preferred language of communication.

(B) The property owner on the call is informed that they should review the assessment contract and financing estimate and disclosure form with all other owners of
 the property.

(C) The efficiency improvement being installed is being financed by a PACE assessment.

(D) The total estimated annual costs the property owner will have to pay under the assessment contract, including applicable fees.

(E) The total estimated average monthly amount of funds the property owner would have to save in order to pay the annual costs under the PACE assessment, including applicable fees.

(F) That the county annual secured property tax bill, which will include the installment of the PACE lien, will be mailed by the county tax collector no later than November 1 each year, and that if the lien is recorded after the fiscal year closes but before the bill is mailed, the first installment may not appear on the county tax bill until the
 following year.

(G) The term of the assessment contract.

(H) That payments on the assessment contract will be made through an additional annual assessment on the property and paid either directly to the county tax collector’s office as part of the total annual secured property tax bill, or through the property owner’s mortgage impound account, and that if the property owner pays taxes through an impound account, the property owner should notify the property owner’s mortgage lender to discuss adjusting the monthly mortgage payment by the estimated monthly cost of the PACE assessment.

(I) That the property will be subject to a lien during the term of the assessment contract and that the obligations under the assessment contract may be required to be paid in full before the property owner sells or refinances the
 property.

(J) That the property owner has disclosed whether the property has received or is seeking additional PACE assessments and has disclosed all other PACE assessments or special taxes that are or about to be placed on the property, if known to and understood by the property owner.

(K) That any potential utility savings are not guaranteed, and will not reduce the assessment payments or total assessment amount.

(L) That the program administrator and contractor do not provide tax advice, and that the property owner should seek professional tax advice if the property owner has questions regarding tax credits, tax deductibility, or of other tax impacts on the PACE assessment or assessment contract.

(M) That if that property tax payment is delinquent
 within the fiscal year, the county tax collector will assess a 10-percent penalty and may assess related costs, as required by state law. A delinquent payment also subjects the property to foreclosure. If the delinquent payment continues past June 30 of a given year and defaults, the county tax collector will assess penalties at the rate of 1 ½ percent per month (18 percent per year), and the property will continue to be subject to foreclosure and may become subject to the county tax collector’s right to sell the property at auction.

(N) That the property owner has a three-business day right to cancel the assessment contract pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5898.16, and that canceling the assessment contract may also cancel the home improvement contract under Section 5940.

(O) That it is the responsibility of the property owner to contact the property owner’s home insurance
 provider to determine whether the efficiency improvement to be financed by the PACE assessment is covered by the property owner’s insurance plan.

(P) That the property owner may repay an amount owed pursuant to an assessment contract before the date that amount is due under the contract without early repayment penalty.

(b) The program administrator shall comply with the following when giving the oral confirmation described in subdivision (a):

(1) The program administrator shall record the oral confirmation in an audio format in accordance with applicable laws.

(2) The program administrator may not comply with the requirement in subdivision (a) through the use of a prerecorded message, or other similar device or method.

(3) Recording of an oral confirmation shall be retained by the program administrator for a period of at least five years from the time of the recording.

(c) The provisions of this section shall be in addition to the documents required to be provided to the property owner under Sections 5898.16 and 5898.17.

(d) At the commencement of the oral confirmation, the program administrator shall ask if the property owner on the call would prefer to communicate during the oral confirmation primarily in a language other than English that is specified in Section 1632 of the Civil Code. If the preferred language is supported by the program administrator, the oral confirmation shall be given in that primary language, except where the property owner on the call chooses to communicate through the property owner’s own interpreter. If
 the preferred language is not supported and an interpreter is not chosen by the property owner on the call, the PACE assessment transaction shall not proceed. For purposes of this subdivision, “the property owner’s own interpreter” means a person, who is not a minor, is able to speak fluently and read with full understanding both the English language and any of the languages specified in Section 1632 of the Civil Code, and who is not employed by, and whose services are not made available through, the program administrator, the public agency, or the contractor.

(e) (1) Beginning on January 1, 2019, if the oral confirmation was conducted primarily in a language other than English that is specified in Section 1632 of the Civil Code, the program administrator shall deliver in writing the disclosures and contract or agreement required by law, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) Assessment contract documents specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5898.20 or Section 5899, 5899.3, or 5899.4, or a special tax described in Section 53328.1 of the Government Code.

(B) The financing estimate and disclosure form specified in Section 5898.17.

(C) The right to cancel form specified in Section 5898.16.

(2) Before the execution of any contract or agreement described in paragraph (1), the program administrator shall deliver a translation of the disclosures, contract, or agreement in the language in which the oral confirmation was conducted, that includes a translation of every term and condition in that contract or agreement.

(f) This section
 shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 837) by Stats. 2020, Ch. 156, Sec. 4.   (AB 1551)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   See later operative version amended by Sec. 5 of Stats. 2020, Ch. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

5913.

(a) (1) Before a property owner executes an assessment contract the program administrator shall do the following:

(A) Make an oral confirmation that at least one owner of the property has a copy of the contract assessment documents required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5898.20 or Section 5899 or 5899.3, or Section 53328.1 of the Government Code, as applicable, with all the key terms completed, the financing estimate and disclosure form specified in Section 5898.17, and the right to cancel form specified in Section 5898.16, with hard copies available upon request.

(B) Make an oral confirmation of the key terms of the assessment contract, in plain language, with the
 property owner on the call or to a verified authorized representative of the owner on the call and shall obtain acknowledgment from the property owner on the call to whom the oral confirmation is given.

(2) The oral confirmation required pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include, but is not limited to, all the following information:

(A) The property owner on the call has the right to have other persons present for the call, and an inquiry as to whether the property owner would like to exercise the right to include anyone else on the call. This shall occur at the onset of the call, after the determination of the preferred language of communication.

(B) The property owner on the call is informed that they should review the assessment contract and financing estimate and disclosure form with all other owners of the
 property.

(C) The efficiency improvement being installed is being financed by a PACE assessment.

(D) The total estimated annual costs the property owner will have to pay under the assessment contract, including applicable fees.

(E) The total estimated average monthly amount of funds the property owner would have to save in order to pay the annual costs under the PACE assessment, including applicable fees.

(F) That the county annual secured property tax bill, which will include the installment of the PACE lien, will be mailed by the county tax collector no later than November 1 each year, and that if the lien is recorded after the fiscal year closes but before the bill is mailed, the first installment may not appear on the county tax bill until the
 following year.

(G) The term of the assessment contract.

(H) That payments on the assessment contract will be made through an additional annual assessment on the property and paid either directly to the county tax collector’s office as part of the total annual secured property tax bill, or through the property owner’s mortgage impound account, and that if the property owner pays taxes through an impound account, the property owner should notify the property owner’s mortgage lender to discuss adjusting the monthly mortgage payment by the estimated monthly cost of the PACE assessment.

(I) That the property will be subject to a lien during the term of the assessment contract and that the obligations under the assessment contract may be required to be paid in full before the property owner sells or refinances the
 property.

(J) That the property owner has disclosed whether the property has received or is seeking additional PACE assessments and has disclosed all other PACE assessments or special taxes that are or are about to be placed on the property, if known to and understood by the property owner.

(K) That any potential utility savings are not guaranteed, and will not reduce the assessment payments or total assessment amount.

(L) That the program administrator and contractor do not provide tax advice, and that the property owner should seek professional tax advice if the property owner has questions regarding tax credits, tax deductibility, or of other tax impacts on the PACE assessment or assessment contract.

(M) That if that property tax payment is
 delinquent within the fiscal year, the county tax collector will assess a 10-percent penalty and may assess related costs, as required by state law. A delinquent payment also subjects the property to foreclosure. If the delinquent payment continues past June 30 of a given year and defaults, the county tax collector will assess penalties at the rate of 1 ½ percent per month (18 percent per year), and the property will continue to be subject to foreclosure and may become subject to the county tax collector’s right to sell the property at auction.

(N) That the property owner has a three-business day right to cancel the assessment contract pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5898.16, and that canceling the assessment contract may also cancel the home improvement contract under Section 5940.

(O) That it is the responsibility of the property owner to contact the property owner’s home
 insurance provider to determine whether the efficiency improvement to be financed by the PACE assessment is covered by the property owner’s insurance plan.

(P) That the property owner may repay an amount owed pursuant to an assessment contract prior to the date that amount is due under the contract without early repayment penalty.

(b) The program administrator shall comply with the following when giving the oral confirmation described in subdivision (a):

(1) The program administrator shall record the oral confirmation in an audio format in accordance with applicable laws.

(2) The program administrator may not comply with the requirement in subdivision (a) through the use of a prerecorded message, or other similar device or method.

(3) Recording of an oral confirmation shall be retained by the program administrator for a period of at least five years from the time of the recording.

(c) The provisions of this section shall be in addition to the documents required to be provided to the property owner under Sections 5898.16 and 5898.17.

(d) At the commencement of the oral confirmation, the program administrator shall ask if the property owner on the call would prefer to communicate during the oral confirmation primarily in a language other than English that is specified in Section 1632 of the Civil Code. If the preferred language is supported by the program administrator, the oral confirmation shall be given in that primary language, except where the property owner on the call chooses to communicate through the property owner’s own interpreter. If
 the preferred language is not supported and an interpreter is not chosen by the property owner on the call, the PACE assessment transaction shall not proceed. For purposes of this subdivision, “the property owner’s own interpreter” means a person, who is not a minor, is able to speak fluently and read with full understanding both the English language and any of the languages specified in Section 1632 of the Civil Code, and who is not employed by, and whose services are not made available through, the program administrator, the public agency, or the contractor.

(e) (1) Beginning on January 1, 2019, if the oral confirmation was conducted primarily in a language other than English that is specified in Section 1632 of the Civil Code, the program administrator shall deliver in writing the disclosures and contract or agreement required by law, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) Assessment contract documents specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5898.20 or Section 5899 or 5899.3, or a special tax described in Section 53328.1 of the Government Code.

(B) The financing estimate and disclosure form specified in Section 5898.17.

(C) The right to cancel form specified in Section 5898.16.

(2) Before the execution of any contract or agreement described in paragraph (1), the program administrator shall deliver a translation of the disclosures, contract, or agreement in the language in which the oral confirmation was conducted, that includes a translation of every term and condition in that contract or agreement.

(f) This section shall become operative
 on January 1, 2029.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 837) by Stats. 2020, Ch. 156, Sec. 5.   (AB 1551)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Section operative January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5914.

A program administrator may not waive or defer the first payment on an assessment contract. A property owner’s first assessment payment shall be due no later than the fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the installation of the efficiency improvement is completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 484, Sec. 1.   (SB 242)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5922.
